Maryland, session 2025, SB0403.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
13–218.
(b) (1) In addition to the clauses required under subsection (a) of this section,
a procurement contract for construction shall include:
[(1)] (I) a clause providing for contract modification if the condition of a
site differs from the condition described in the specifications; [and]
[(2)] (II) a clause covering the requirements for notice of contract claims,
submission of contract claims, and resolution of contract claims under § 15–219 of this
article; AND
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0403*

SENATE BILL 403
(III) A CLAUSE REQUIRING CONTRACT MODIFICATION FOR THE
EQUITABLE ADJUSTMENT OF THE CONTRACT FOR INCREASED COSTS FOR
COMPENSATION AND BENEFITS AS A RESULT OF:
1. STATUTORY CHANGES INCREASING REQUIRED
COMPENSATION OR BENEFITS; OR
2. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING.
(2) IN ADDITION TO THE CLAUSES REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)
OF THIS SECTION, A PROCUREMENT CONTRACT FOR SERVICES SHALL INCLUDE A
CLAUSE REQUIRING CONTRACT MODIFICATION FOR THE EQUITABLE ADJUSTMENT
OF THE CONTRACT FOR INCREASED COSTS FOR COMPENSATION AND BENEFITS AS A
RESULT OF:
(I) STATUTORY CHANGES INCREASING REQUIRED
COMPENSATION OR BENEFITS; OR
(II) COLLECTIVE BARGAINING.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.